Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.250

Dyslexia definition.

For the purposes of RCW 28A.300.700, * 28A.300.710, 28A.300.720, 28A.320.260, and 28A.320.270, "dyslexia" means a specific learning disorder that is neurological in origin and that is characterized by unexpected difficulties with accurate or fluent word recognition and by poor spelling and decoding abilities that are not consistent with the person's intelligence, motivation, and sensory capabilities. These difficulties typically result from a deficit in the phonological components of language that is often unexpected in relation to other cognitive abilities. In addition, the difficulties are not typically a result of ineffective classroom instruction. Secondary consequences may include problems in reading comprehension and reduced reading experience that can impede growth of vocabulary and background knowledge.

[ 2018 c 75 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.300.710 expired August 1, 2023.